District of Columbia statutes.
29A-1071

Repealed

Limited liability companies included in a proclamation — Procedure for reinstatement.

Repealed.

July 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-138, § 72, 41 DCR 3010
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-255, § 31, 44 DCR 1271
June 24, 2000, D.C. Law 13-133, § 2(k), 47 DCR 2686
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(s), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-1071.
1981 Ed., § 29-1371.